Utah statutes.
32A-1-703 (Repealed 07/01/11).   Use of information from a criminal background check.

The commission or department may use information obtained pursuant to Section 32A-1-702 only for one or more of the following purposes:

(1)  enforcing this title;

(2)  determining whether or not an individual is convicted of any of the following offenses that disqualify the individual under this title from acting in a capacity described in Subsection 32A-1-702(2):

(a)  a felony under federal or state law;

(b)  a violation of a federal law, state law, or local ordinance concerning the sale, manufacture, distribution, warehousing, adulteration, or transportation of an alcoholic beverage;

(c)  a crime involving moral turpitude; or

(d)  on two or more occasions within the previous five years, driving under the influence of alcohol, a drug, or the combined influence of alcohol and a drug;

(3)  determining whether or not an individual fails to accurately disclose the person's criminal history on an application or document filed with the department or commission;

(4)  approving or denying an application for employment with the department;

(5)  taking disciplinary action against an employee of the department, including possible termination of employment;

(6)  granting or denying an application to operate a package agency;

(7)  granting or denying an application for a license;

(8)  granting or denying the renewal of a package agency contract;

(9)  granting or denying the renewal of a license;

(10)  suspending the operation of a package agency;

(11)  terminating a package agency contract; or

(12)  suspending or revoking a license.

